fi: Pitoisuustaso: Kaksinkertainen; Yksinkertainen; Kolminkertainen; Muu
da: Koncentrationsniveau: Dobbelt; Enkelt; Tredobbelt; Andet
ro-RO: Nivelul de concentrare: Dublă; Simplă; Triplă; Altele
ja: 濃度レベル: ダブル; シングル; トリプル; その他
vi: Mức độ đậm đặc: Gấp đôi; Đơn; Gấp ba; Khác
cs: Úroveň koncentrace: Dvojitá; Jednoduchá; Trojitá; Jiné
nl: Concentratieniveau: Dubbel; Enkel; Drievoudig; Overig
ko: 농도 수준: 2배; 1배; 3배; 기타
sv: Koncentrationsnivå: Dubbel; Enkel; Trippel; Annan
hu: Koncentráció szintje: Dupla; Szimpla; Tripla; Egyéb
hr-HR: Razina koncentracije: Dvostruko; Jednostruko; Trostruko; Ostalo
sk-SK: Úroveň koncentrácie: Dvojitá; Jednoduchá; Trojitá; Iné
el: Επίπεδο συγκέντρωσης: Διπλό; Μονό; Τριπλό; Άλλο
es: Nivel de concentración: Doble; Simple; Triple; Otro
zh-CN: 浓度水平: 双倍; 单倍; 三倍; 其他
pt-PT: Nível de concentração: Duplo; Único; Triplo; Outro
fr: Niveau de concentration: Double; Simple; Triple; Autre
de: Konzentrationsgrad: Zweifach; Einfach; Dreifach; Sonstige
zh-TW: 濃度等級: 雙倍; 單倍; 三倍; 其他
sl-SI: Raven koncentracije: Dvojno; Enojno; Trojno; Drugo
pl: Poziom koncentracji: Podwójne; Pojedyncze; Potrójne; Inne
pt-BR: Nível de concentração: Duplo; Único; Triplo; Outro
lt-LT: Koncentracijos lygis: Dviguba; Vienguba; Triguba; Kita
bg-BG: Ниво на концентрация: Двойна; Единична; Тройна; Друго
en: Concentration level: Double; Single; Triple; Other
it: Livello di concentrazione: Doppio; Singolo; Triplo; Altro
th: ระดับความเข้มข้น: 2 เท่า; 1 เท่า; 3 เท่า; อื่นๆ
nb: Konsentrasjonsnivå: Dobbel; Enkel; Trippel; Annet
ru: Уровень концентрации: Двойная; Одинарная; Тройная; Другое
tr: Konsantrasyon seviyesi: Çift; Tek; Üçlü; Diğer